District of Columbia statutes.
21-2077

Foreign conservator; proof of authority; bond; powers.

If a conservator has not been appointed in the District and no petition in a protective proceeding is pending in the District, a conservator appointed in the state in which the protected individual resides may file with the court authenticated copies of letters of appointment and copies of any bond. The domiciliary foreign conservator may then exercise, as to assets in the District, all powers of a conservator appointed in the District and may maintain actions and proceedings in the District subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-2077.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2-331 of the Uniform Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Act (1982 Act).